Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds, federal funds and  funds described in section 2 of this 2019 Act, col-
lected or received by the Department of State Lands, for the following purposes:
(1) Common School Fund
programs................................... $ 41,591,062
(2) Oregon Removal-Fill
Mitigation Fund ........................ $ 1,996,518
(3) South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve operations.................... $ 2,305,594
(4) Capital improvements ............... $ 526,420
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$1,765,000 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  by the Department of State Lands from the Portland Harbor Cleanup
Fund established by ORS 274.064.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of State Lands for
the following purposes:
(1) South Slough National
Estuarine Research
Reserve operations.................... $ 1,989,225
(2) Common School Fund
programs................................... $ 157,252
SECTION 4.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $589,920
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Economic  De-
velopment Fund to the Department of State Lands for the payment of debt service.
Enrolled House Bill 5035 (HB 5035-A) Page 1
SECTION 5. For the  biennium beginning July 1, 2019, expenditures by the Department
of State Lands for tenant-incurred utility charges, unclaimed property finders fees and State
Treasurer charges for investment-related transactions are not limited.
SECTION 6.
This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House May 30, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5035 (HB 5035-A) Page 2